test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-khasa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - khasa - will CHECK : #
     khasa+V+NFut: khasaqáang
     khasa+V+IFut: khasaasdláang
     
     khasa+V+Neg+NFut: khasaaqánggang
     khasa+V+Neg+IFut: khasaasdläqánggang
     
     khasa+V+Hab+NFut: khasaqáang
     khasa+V+Hab+IFut: khasaasdláang
     
     khasa+V+Hab+Neg+NFut: khasaaqánggang
     khasa+V+Hab+Neg+IFut: khasaasdläqánggang
     
     khasa+V+3Pl+NFut: khasaqáang
     khasa+V+3Pl+IFut: khasaasdláang
     
     khasa+V+Neg+3Pl+NFut: khasaaqánggang
     khasa+V+Neg+3Pl+IFut: khasaasdläqánggang
     
     khasa+V+Hab+3Pl+NFut: khasaqáang
     khasa+V+Hab+3Pl+IFut: khasaasdláang
     
     khasa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+NFut: khasaaqánggang
     khasa+V+Hab+Neg+3Pl+IFut: khasaasdläqánggang
